Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-172
Director of Correctional Services; appointment; salary; qualifications.

The Governor shall appoint and fix the salary of the Director of Correctional Services with the approval of the Legislature. The Director of Correctional Services shall be qualified for his position by appropriate training and experience in corrections and such director shall have a minimum of ten years of correctional administrative work.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 3, p. 3073;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 40.